District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.71

Use of reserve funds for administrative expenses.

(a)

No more than 20% of the funds in the opportunity account reserve fund account shall be used for administrative costs of the opportunity account program during either of the first 2 years of an opportunity account program. No more than 15% of the funds in the opportunity account reserve fund account may be used for administrative costs during any subsequent year.

(b)

Funds deposited by account holders shall not be used for administrative costs.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-266, § 12, 48 DCR 1240